Wisconsin, session 2025, AB277.
do enact as follows:AB277,11Section 1. 227.137 (3) (b) (intro.) and 1. of the statutes are consolidated, 2renumbered 227.137 (3) (b) and amended to read:AB277,3,43227.137 (3) (b) An analysis and detailed quantification of the economic impact 4of the proposed rule, prepared in accordance with sub. (3m), including the 5implementation and compliance costs that are reasonably expected to be incurred 6by or passed along to the businesses, local governmental units, and individuals that 7may be affected by the proposed rule, specifically including all of the following: 1. 8An estimate of the total implementation and compliance costs that are reasonably 9expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, 10and individuals as a result of the proposed rule, expressed as well as any cost 11savings that are reasonably expected to be realized by those businesses, local 12governmental units, and individuals. The agency shall list out the costs and cost 13savings as they pertain to each affected type of business, local governmental unit, 14and individual. The agency shall also compile the total net costs and cost savings 15for all affected businesses, local governmental units, and individuals and shall 1express the result as a single dollar figure. With respect to an independent 2economic impact analysis prepared under sub. (4m) or s. 227.19 (5) (b) 3., the person 3preparing the analysis shall provide a detailed explanation of any variance from the 4agency’s estimate under this subdivision paragraph.AB277,25Section 2. 227.137 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,3,96227.137 (3) (c) An analysis of the actual and quantifiable benefits of the 7proposed rule not otherwise described under par. (b), including an assessment of 8how effective the proposed rule will be in addressing the policy problem that the 9rule is intended to address.AB277,310Section 3. 227.137 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB277,3,1911227.137 (3m) For purposes of sub. (3) (b), the estimate of the implementation 12and compliance costs that are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along 13to the businesses, local governmental units, and individuals that may be affected by 14the proposed rule, as well as any cost savings that are reasonably expected to be 15realized by those businesses, local governmental units, and individuals, shall be 16attributed to the proposed rule regardless of the level or extent of discretion 17afforded to the agency in determining the policies of the proposed rule and 18regardless of whether those costs and cost savings are attributable to any of the 19following:AB277,3,2220(a) The underlying statutory directives or objectives that are the basis for the 21proposed rule or that determine or otherwise impact the policies proposed to be 22included in the rule.AB277,4,223(b) Any other statutory directives or objectives that impact the proposed rule 1or that determine or otherwise impact the policies proposed to be included in the 2rule.AB277,4,33(c) Requirements, limitations, or other constraints imposed under federal law.AB277,4,44(d) Other factors that bear on the necessity of the policies of the proposed rule.AB277,45Section 4. 227.137 (4m) (b) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,4,116227.137 (4m) (b) 2. a. If the estimate in the independent economic impact 7analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under sub. (3) (b) 1. varies 8from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or varies from the agency’s 9determination that there will be no implementation or compliance costs, the 10cochairperson shall assess the agency that is proposing the proposed rule for the 11costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis.AB277,512Section 5. 227.137 (4m) (b) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,4,1913227.137 (4m) (b) 2. b. If the estimate in the independent economic impact 14analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under sub. (3) (b) 1. does not 15vary from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or is in accord with the 16agency’s determination that there will be no implementation and compliance costs, 17the costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis shall be paid 18from the appropriation account that corresponds to his or her house of the 19legislature under s. 20.765 (1) (a) or (b).AB277,620Section 6. 227.137 (4m) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,4,2221227.137 (4m) (c) 1. Include in the analysis the information that is required 22under sub. (3), prepared in accordance with sub. (3m).AB277,723Section 7. 227.139 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,5,924227.139 (1) If an economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (2), a 1revised economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4), or an independent 2economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. 3indicates that $10,000,000 or more in there are any net implementation and 4compliance costs that are are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along 5to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a 6result of the proposed rule, the agency proposing the rule shall stop work on the 7proposed rule and may not continue promulgating the proposed rule 8notwithstanding any provision authorizing or requiring the agency to promulgate 9the proposed rule, except as authorized under sub. (2).AB277,810Section 8. 227.139 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,5,2311227.139 (2) (b) If an agency is prohibited from promulgating a rule under sub. 12(1), the agency may modify the proposed rule, if the modification is germane to the 13subject matter of the proposed rule, to address the implementation and compliance 14costs of the proposed rule. If the agency modifies a proposed rule under this 15paragraph, the agency shall prepare a revised economic impact analysis under s. 16227.137 (4). Following the modification, the agency may continue with the rule-17making process as provided in this subchapter if the revised economic impact 18analysis prepared by the agency indicates, and any independent economic impact 19analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. subsequent to the 20agency’s modification also indicates, that $10,000,000 or more in no net 21implementation and compliance costs are not reasonably expected to be incurred by 22or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-23year period as a result of the proposed rule.AB277,91Section 9. 227.139 (2) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB277,6,162227.139 (2) (c) If an agency is prohibited from promulgating a rule under sub. 3(1), the agency may promulgate a separate rule or use a previously promulgated 4rule to fully offset the implementation and compliance costs of the proposed rule, if 5the other rule is promulgated in the same calendar year as the proposed rule and 6has not previously been used to offset costs under this paragraph. If the agency 7promulgates or uses a rule as provided under this paragraph, the agency shall 8prepare a revised economic impact analysis under s. 227.137 (4). The agency may 9continue with the rule-making process as provided in this subchapter if the revised 10economic impact analysis prepared by the agency indicates, and any independent 11economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. 12subsequent to the agency’s modification also indicates, that another rule 13promulgated by the agency fully offsets any implementation and compliance costs 14that are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local 15governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a result of the 16proposed rule.AB277,1017Section 10. 227.19 (5) (b) 3. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,6,2318227.19 (5) (b) 3. a. If the estimate in the independent economic impact 19analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under s. 227.137 (3) (b) 1. 20varies from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or varies from the agency’s 21determination that there will be no implementation or compliance costs, the 22committee shall assess the agency that is proposing the proposed rule for the costs 23of completing the independent economic impact analysis.AB277,111Section 11. 227.19 (5) (b) 3. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB277,7,72227.19 (5) (b) 3. b. If the estimate in the independent economic impact 3analysis of total implementation and compliance costs under s. 227.137 (3) (b) 1. 4does not vary from the agency’s estimate by 15 percent or more or is in accord with 5the agency’s determination that there will be no implementation and compliance 6costs, the costs of completing the independent economic impact analysis shall be 7paid in equal parts from the appropriation accounts under s. 20.765 (1) (a) and (b).AB277,128Section 12. Initial applicability.AB277,7,109(1) This act first applies to a proposed rule whose statement of scope is 10presented for approval under s. 227.135 (2) on the effective date of this subsection.AB277,7,1111